tables/hu-exceptionwords.cti
# liblouis: Hungarian Grade 1 table
#
#  Based on the Linux screenreader BRLTTY, copyright (C) 1999-2011 by the BRLTTY Team
#
#  Copyright (C) 2011-2012, IT Foundation for the Visually Impaired - Hungary. Homepage: www.infoalap.hu 
#  All rights reserved
#
#  This file is free software; you can redistribute it and/or modify it
#   under the terms of the Lesser or Library GNU General Public License
#  as published by the
#  Free Software Foundation; either version 3, or (at your option) any
#  later version.
#
#  This file is distributed in the hope that it will be useful, but
#  WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
#  MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
#  Library GNU General Public License for more details.
#
#  You should have received a copy of the Library GNU General Public
#  License along with this program; see the file COPYING.  If not, write
#  to
#  the Free Software Foundation, 51 Franklin Street, Fifth Floor,
#  Boston, MA 02110-1301, USA.
#
#  Maintained by Attila Hammer  hammer.attila@infoalap.hu"
#
# If you found bugs with hungarian grade1 table, report it with following address:
# Attila Hammer <hammer.attila@infoalap.hu
#If you have a Launchpad account, report table related requests with following bug tracker address: https://bugs.launchpad.net/belin

#This file containing exception words with different need appliing general hungarian combined braille letters, for example cs, ccs, ty, tty rules
#cs, ccs related exceptions
partword arccs 1-1235-14-146	For example arccsont, harccsoport, harccselekmény words
partword arcs\x00e9r\x00fcl 1-1235-14-234-16-1235-12356-123	For example arcsérülés word
partword habarccs 125-1-12-1-1235-146-146	For example habarccsal word
begword harcso 125-1-1235-14-234-135	For example harcsor word
begword \x00e1rb\x00f3ccs\x00fa 4-1235-12-246-14-146-346	For example árbóccsúcs word
begword \x00e1rboccs\x00fa 4-1235-12-135-14-146-346	For example árboccsúcs word
begword fegyenc 124-15-1456-15-1345-14	For example fegyenccsoport, fegyencsapkát words
begword filc 124-24-123-14	For example filccsizma word
partword gerinc 1245-15-1235-24-1345-14	For example gerincsérült, gerincsérv words
partword kilenc 13-24-123-15-1345-14	For example kilenccsatorna word
partword kavics 13-1-1236-24-146	For example kavicszápor, kavicszátony, kavicszuzalék, kavicsszerű words
begword kudarc 13-136-145-1-1235-14	For example kudarcsorozat
begword k\x00fcl\x00f6ncs\x00e9 13-12356-123-12345-1345-14-234-16	For example különcség word
begword l\x00e1nc 123-4-1345-14	For example láncszem, lánccsörgés words
partword licenc 123-24-14-15-1345-14	For example licencsértés, licenccsalád words
partword malac 134-1-123-1-14	For example malacság, malacsült words
begword nerc 1345-15-1235-14	For example nercstóla word
begword nercsinszk 1345-15-1235-146-24-1345-156-13	For example nercstóla word
always p\x00e1cs\x00f3 1234-4-14-234-246	Pácsó word
partword polc 1234-135-123-14	For example polcsor word
begword ipolcs 24-1234-135-123-146
partword tapolcs\x00e1 2345-1-1234-135-123-146-4
begword opolcs 135-1234-135-123-146
partword porcs\x00e9 1234-135-1235-14-234-16	For example porcsérülés word
begword szocseg\x00e9 156-135-14-234-15-1245-16	For example szocsegély word
begword k\x00f3ccs 13-246-14-146	For example kóccsomó word

partword t\x00e1nc 2345-4-1345-14	For example tánccsoport word
partword s\x00e1t\x00e1ncsap 234-4-2345-4-1345-146-1-1234	For example sátáncsapat word
partword piaccs 1234-24-1-14-146	For example piaccsarnok word
partword szanit\x00e9ccs 156-1-1345-24-2345-16-14-146	For example szanitéccsoport word
partword pokr\x00f3ccs 1234-135-13-1235-246-14-146	For example pokróccsík word
partword csz\x00f6r 146-126-12345-1235	For example kulcszörgés, bilincszörgés, kilincszörgést words
partword kart\x00e1cs 13-1-1235-2345-4-146	For example kartácszápor word
partword papucsz 1234-1-1234-136-146-126	For example papucszápor word
begword \x00ednyencs\x00e9 34-1246-15-1345-14-234-16	For example ínyencség word
begword boh\x00f3c 12-135-125-246-14	For example bohócsapkája word
partword kalap\x00e1cszen 13-1-123-1-1234-4-146-126-15-1345	For example kalapácszengés word
begword \x00e1k\x00e1cs 4-13-4-14-234	For example ákácsövény word
begword ak\x00e1cs 1-13-4-14-234	For example akácsövény word
begword viccso 1236-24-14-14-234-135	For example viccsor word need this exception
begword \x00e9rcsis 16-1235-14-234-24-234	For example ércsisak word
always \x00e9rcsas 16-1235-14-234-1-234	For example ércsas word
begword virgonc 1236-24-1235-1245-135-1345-14	For example virgoncság word need this exception
begword martal\x00f3c 134-1-1235-2345-1-123-246-14
partword \x00fajonc 346-245-135-1345-14	For example újoncság word
begword kuruc 13-136-1235-136-14	For example kurucság word
begword pal\x00f3c 1234-1-123-246-14	For example palócság word
begword fejl\x00e9c 124-15-245-123-16-14
begword nyolc 1246-135-123-14	For example nyolcsebességes, nyolccsatornás words
begword b\x00e9rcs\x00fcve 12-16-1235-14-234-12356-1236-15	For example bércsüveg word
begword elm\x00e9ncs\x00e9 15-123-134-16-1345-14-234-16	For example elméncség word
begword \x00e9rcsala 16-1235-14-234-1-123-1	For example ércsalak word
partword \x00e9rccs 16-1235-14-146	For example érccsapadék, érccsengés, érccsatorna words
begword \x00e9rcsely 16-1235-14-234-15-456	For example ércselyem word
begword \x00e9rcs\x00ed 16-1235-14-234-34	For example ércsíp, ércsípjába, ércsípláda words
partword \x00e9rcs\x00edpte 16-1235-146-34-1234-2345-15	For example ércsíptető word an exception
begword \x00e9rcsodr 16-1235-14-234-135-145-1235	For example ércsodrony word
begword garaboncser 1245-1-1235-1-12-135-1345-14-234-15-1235	For example garaboncsereg word
begword labanc 123-1-12-1-1345-14
begword k\x00e9jenc 13-16-245-15-1345-14
partword jegeccsop 245-15-1245-15-14-146-135-1234	For example jegeccsoport word
partword lazac 123-1-126-1-14	For example lazaccsontváz word
partword \x00e1rbocsud 4-1235-12-135-14-234-136-145	For example árbocsudarat word
partword vakarccs 1236-1-13-1-1235-146-146	For example vakarccsal word
always arcseb 1-1235-14-234-15-12	For example arcseb, arcsebe words
partword nyargonccs 1246-1-1235-1245-135-1345-14-146	For example nyargonccsizma word
partword perecs\x00fct 1234-15-1235-15-14-234-12356-2345	For example perecsütőnő word
begword princs\x00e9g 1234-1235-24-1345-14-234-16-1245	For example princséged word
always r\x00e1cs\x00e1g 1235-4-14-234-4-1245	For example rácság, rácságból words
partword suhanc 234-136-125-1-1345-14	For example suhanccsürhe, suhancsereg word
partword udvaronc 136-145-1236-1-1235-135-1345-14	For example udvaroncsereg word need this exception
partword pereccs 1234-15-1235-15-14-146	For example vállpereccsontjából word
